Colorado statutes. TITLE 19 Children's Code
PART 3 CHILD ABUSE OR NEGLECT
19-3-304.5. Emergency possession of certain abandoned children - definition.

If a parent voluntarily delivers a child to a firefighter, as defined in section 18-3-201 (1.5), or a staff member who engages in the admission, care, or treatment of patients at a hospital or community clinic emergency center, as defined in subsection
(9) of this section, when the firefighter is at a fire station or the staff member is at a hospital or community clinic emergency center, as defined in subsection (9) of this section, the firefighter or staff member of the hospital
or community clinic emergency center shall, without a court order, take temporary physical custody of the child if:

The child is seventy-two hours old or younger; and

The parent did not express an intent to return for the child.

If a firefighter or staff member of a hospital or community clinic emergency center takes temporary physical custody of a child pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the firefighter or staff member shall:

Perform any act necessary, in accordance with generally accepted standards of professional practice, to protect, preserve, or aid the physical health or safety of the child during the temporary physical custody; and

Notify a law enforcement officer and the county department of the abandonment within twenty-four hours after the abandonment.

A firefighter or staff member of a hospital or community clinic emergency center shall incur no civil or criminal liability for any good faith acts or omissions performed pursuant to this section.

Upon receipt of notice pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, a law enforcement officer shall take the abandoned child into temporary custody pursuant to section 19-3-401.

(4.5) Any document prepared by a firefighter, a hospital or community clinic emergency center staff member, or a law enforcement officer pursuant to this section is a dependency and neglect record and is subject to the confidentiality provisions of section
19-1-307.

Each county department of human or social services shall maintain and update on a monthly basis a report of the number of children who have been abandoned pursuant to this section. Each county department of human or social services shall submit such information
to the state department of human services.

Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), the state department of human services shall submit an annual report to the general assembly, beginning January 1, 2001, that compiles the monthly reports, required pursuant to subsection (5) of this section,
of the number of children abandoned pursuant to this section.

The general assembly hereby finds, determines, and declares that a county department of human or social services shall place an abandoned child with a potential adoptive parent as soon as possible. The general assembly further declares that, as soon as
lawfully possible, a county department of human or social services shall proceed with a motion to terminate the parental rights of a parent who abandons a child.

A parent who utilizes the provisions of this section shall not, for that reason alone, be found to be responsible in a confirmed report of abuse or neglect.

"Community clinic emergency center" means a community clinic licensed by the department of public health and environment pursuant to section 25-3-101 (2)(a)(I)(B) that:

Delivers emergency services; and

Provides emergency care twenty-four hours per day and seven days a week throughout the year, except if located in a rural or frontier area that does not have the demand to support twenty-four-hour service or only operates each year during a specified
time period due to seasonal population influx.

Source:

L. 2000:
Entire section added, p. 2004, § 2, effective June 3.

L. 2002:
(4.5) added, p. 168, § 1, effective April 1.

L. 2003:
(2)(b) amended and (8) added, p. 769, § 1, effective March 25.

L. 2006:
(8) amended, p. 1493, § 24, effective June 1.

L. 2014:
IP(1) amended, (HB 14-1214), ch. 336, p. 1499, § 12, effective August 6.

L. 2017:
(6) amended, (SB 17-234), ch. 154, p. 521, § 5, effective August 9.

L. 2018:
IP(1), IP(2), (3), and (4.5) amended and (9) added, (SB 18-050), ch. 20, p. 270, § 3, effective March 7; (5) and (7) amended, (SB 18-092), ch. 38, p. 417, § 52, effective August 8.

Cross references:
For the legislative declaration in SB 18-092, see section 1 of chapter 38, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

19-3-305. Required report of postmortem investigation.

Any person who is required by section 19-3-304 to report known or suspected child abuse or neglect who has reasonable cause to suspect that a child died as a result of child abuse or neglect shall report such fact immediately to a local law enforcement
agency and to the appropriate medical examiner. The local law enforcement agency and the medical examiner shall accept such report for investigation and shall report their findings to the local law enforcement agency, the district
attorney, and the county department.

The county department shall forward a copy of such report to the state department of human services.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 765, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 2003:
(2) amended, p. 1405, § 9, effective January 1, 2004.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-10-105 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

Cross references:
For the legislative declaration contained in the 2003 act amending subsection (2), see section 1 of chapter 196, Session Laws of Colorado 2003.

19-3-306. Evidence of abuse - color photographs and X rays.

Any child health associate, person licensed to practice medicine in this state, registered nurse or licensed practical nurse, hospital personnel engaged in the admission, examination, care, or treatment of patients, medical examiner, coroner, social worker,
psychologist, or local law enforcement officer who has before him a child he reasonably believes has been abused or neglected may take or cause to be taken color photographs of the areas of trauma visible on the child. If medically
indicated, such person may take or cause to be taken X rays of the child.

Copies or duplicate originals of any color photographs which show evidence of child abuse shall be immediately forwarded to the county department or to the local law enforcement agency. Original photographs shall be made available upon the request of
such department or agency. X rays which show evidence of child abuse or copies of the X-ray report, or both, shall be made available upon request to the county department or the local law enforcement agency. Any person who forwards
original photographs or X rays pursuant to this section shall maintain copies or duplicate originals thereof.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 766, § 1, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-10-106 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

19-3-307. Reporting procedures.

Reports of known or suspected child abuse or neglect made pursuant to this article shall be made immediately to the county department, the local law enforcement agency, or through the child abuse reporting hotline system as set forth in section 26-5-111,
C.R.S., and shall be followed promptly by a written report prepared by those persons required to report. The county department shall submit a report of confirmed child abuse or neglect within sixty days of receipt of the report
to the state department in a manner prescribed by the state department.

Reports of known or suspected child abuse or neglect made pursuant to this article 3 must include the following information whenever possible:

The name, address, age, sex, and race of the child;

The name and address of the person responsible for the suspected abuse or neglect;

The nature and extent of the child's injuries, including any evidence of previous cases of known or suspected abuse or neglect of the child or the child's siblings;

The names and addresses of the persons responsible for the suspected abuse or neglect, if known;

The family composition;

The source of the report and the name, address, and occupation of the person making the report;

Any action taken by the reporting source;

Any other information that the person making the report believes may be helpful in furthering the purposes of this part 3;

The military affiliation of the individual who has custody or control of the child who is the subject of the investigation of child abuse or neglect, if such individual is a member of the armed forces or a spouse, or a significant other or family member
residing in the home of the member of the armed forces. This information shall be shared with the appropriate military installation authorities pursuant to the requirements set forth in sections 19-1-303 (2.6) and 19-1-307
(2)(w).

(2.5) Notwithstanding the requirements set forth in subsection (2) of this section, any officer or employee of a county, district, or municipal public health agency or state department of public health and environment who makes a report pursuant to section
25-1-122 (4)(d) or 25-4-405, C.R.S., shall include only the information described in said section.

A copy of the report of known or suspected child abuse or neglect shall be transmitted immediately by the county department to the district attorney's office and to the local law enforcement agency.

When the county department reasonably believes a criminal act of abuse or neglect of a child in foster care has occurred, the county department shall transmit immediately a copy of the written report prepared by the county department in accordance with
subsection (1) of this section to the district attorney's office and to the local law enforcement agency.

A written report from persons or officials required by this part 3 to report known or suspected child abuse or neglect shall be admissible as evidence in any proceeding relating to child abuse, subject to the limitations of section 19-1-307.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 766, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 90:
(4) amended, p. 1012, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 93:
(2.5) added, p. 1609, § 2, effective June 6.

L. 94:
(2.5) amended, p. 2737, § 364, effective July 1.

L. 98:
(4) amended, p. 822, § 27, effective August 5.

L. 2001:
(3) amended, p. 758, § 9, effective June 1.

L. 2003:
(1) amended, p. 1406, § 10, effective January 1, 2004.

L. 2010:
(2.5) amended, (HB 10-1422), ch. 419, p. 2075, § 36, effective August 11.

L. 2013:
(1) amended, (HB 13-1271), ch. 219, p. 1022, § 3, effective May 14.

L. 2016:
(2.5) amended, (SB 16-146), ch. 230, p. 919, § 14, effective July 1.

L. 2017:
IP(2) amended and (2)(i) added, (SB 17-028), ch. 332, p. 1784, § 4, effective August 9.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-10-108 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

Cross references:
For the legislative declaration contained in the 2003 act amending subsection (1), see section 1 of chapter 196, Session Laws of Colorado 2003.

19-3-308. Action upon report of intrafamilial, institutional, or third-party abuse - investigations - child protection team - rules - report.

The county department shall respond immediately upon receipt of any report of a known or suspected incident of intrafamilial abuse or neglect to assess the abuse involved and the appropriate response to the report. The assessment shall be in accordance
with rules adopted by the state board of social services to determine the risk of harm to such child and the appropriate response to such risks. Appropriate responses shall include, but are not limited to, screening reports
that do not require further investigation, providing appropriate intervention services, pursuing reports that require further investigation, and conducting immediate investigations. The immediate concern of any assessment
or investigation shall be the protection of the child, and, where possible, the preservation of the family unit.

Repealed.

It shall be an appropriate response to a report of a known or suspected incident of intrafamilial abuse or neglect for a county department to require a parent or a child placement agency assisting a parent to verify that a petition for relinquishment
has been filed or is imminent and to deem that a report does not require additional investigation pending finalization of the relinquishment in the following circumstance:

When the report of a known or suspected incident of intrafamilial abuse or neglect involves a case in which the child tests positive at birth for either a schedule I or a schedule II controlled substance; and

The parents of the child have filed or a child placement agency assisting the parents has filed a petition for relinquishment or anticipates filing a petition for relinquishment pursuant to the expedited relinquishment process described in section 19-5-103.5.

(1.5) (a) Upon referral to the county department, the county department shall assess the possibility of abuse or neglect.

If, during the investigation and assessment process, the county department determines that the family's issues may be attributable to the child's mental health status, rather than dependency or neglect issues, and that mental health treatment services
pursuant to section 27-67-104 may be more appropriate, the county department shall contact the mental health agency, as that term is defined in section 27-67-103 (10). Within ten days after the commencement of the investigation,
the county department shall meet with a representative from the mental health agency and the family. The county department, in conjunction with the mental health agency, shall jointly determine whether mental health services
should be provided pursuant to section 27-67-104 or whether the provision of services through the county department is more appropriate.

On and after April 15, 2010, if a county department of human or social services that is participating in the differential response program pursuant to section 19-3-308.3 determines from an assessment performed pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection
(1.5) that the known or suspected incident of intrafamilial abuse or neglect that was the basis for the assessment is of low or moderate risk, the county department, in lieu of performing an investigation pursuant to this
section, may proceed in accordance with the provisions of section 19-3-308.3.

The investigation, to the extent that it is reasonably possible, shall include:

The credibility of the source or the report;

The nature, extent, and cause of the abuse or neglect;

The identity of the person responsible for such abuse or neglect;

The names and conditions of any other children living in the same place;

The environment and the relationship of any children therein to the person responsible for the suspected abuse or neglect;

All other data deemed pertinent.

The investigation shall include an interview with or observance of the child who is the subject of a report of abuse or neglect. The investigation may include a visit to the child's place of residence or place of custody or wherever the child may be located,
as indicated by the report. In addition, in connection with any investigation, the alleged perpetrator shall be advised as to the allegation of abuse and neglect and the circumstances surrounding such allegation and shall
be afforded an opportunity to respond.

If admission to the child's place of residence cannot be obtained, the juvenile court or the district court with juvenile jurisdiction, upon good cause shown, shall order the responsible person or persons to allow the interview, examination, and investigation.
Should the responsible person or persons refuse to allow the interview, examination, and investigation, the juvenile court or the district court with juvenile jurisdiction shall hold an immediate proceeding to show cause
why the responsible person or persons shall not be held in contempt of court and committed to jail until such time as the child is produced for the interview, examination, and investigation or until information is produced
that establishes that said person or persons cannot aid in providing information about the child. Such person or persons may be held without bond. During the course of any such hearing, the responsible person or persons,
or any necessary witness, may be granted use immunity by the district attorney against the use of any statements made during such hearing in a subsequent or pending criminal action.

The county department, except as provided in subsections (5) and (5.3) of this section, shall be the agency responsible for the coordination of all investigations of all reports of known or suspected incidents of intrafamilial abuse or neglect. The county
department shall arrange for such investigations to be conducted by persons trained to conduct either the complete investigation or such parts thereof as may be assigned. The county department shall conduct the investigation
in conjunction with the local law enforcement agency, to the extent a joint investigation is possible and deemed appropriate, and any other appropriate agency. The county department may arrange for the initial investigation
to be conducted by another agency with personnel having appropriate training and skill. The county department shall provide for persons to be continuously available to respond to such reports. Contiguous counties may cooperate
to fulfill the requirements of this subsection (4). The county department or other agency authorized to conduct the investigation pursuant to this subsection (4), for the purpose of such investigation, shall have access
to the records and reports of child abuse or neglect maintained by the state department for information under the name of the child or the suspected perpetrator.

Upon the receipt of a report, if the county department reasonably believes that an incident of intrafamilial abuse or neglect has occurred, it shall immediately offer social services to the child who is the subject of the report and his family and may
file a petition in the juvenile court or the district court with juvenile jurisdiction on behalf of such child. If, before the investigation is completed, the opinion of the investigators is that assistance of the local
law enforcement agency is necessary for the protection of the child or other children under the same care, the local law enforcement agency shall be notified. If immediate removal is necessary to protect the child or other
children under the same care from further abuse, the child or children may be placed in protective custody in accordance with sections 19-3-401 (1)(a) and 19-3-405.

Upon the receipt of a report, if the county department assessment concludes that a child has been a victim of intrafamilial, institutional, or third-party abuse or neglect in which he or she has been subjected to human trafficking of a minor for sexual
servitude, as described in section 18-3-504, or commercial sexual exploitation of a child, it shall, when necessary and appropriate, immediately offer social services to the child who is the subject of the report and to
his or her family, and it may file a petition in the juvenile court or the district court with juvenile jurisdiction on behalf of such child. If, at any time after the commencement of an investigation, the county department
has reasonable cause to suspect that the child or any other child under the same care is a victim of human trafficking, the county department shall notify the local law enforcement agency as soon as it is reasonably practicable
to do so. If immediate removal is necessary to protect the child or other children under the same care from further abuse, the child or children may be placed in protective custody in accordance with sections 19-3-401 (1)(a)
and 19-3-405. In instances of third-party abuse or neglect as it relates to human trafficking, a county department of human or social services may, but is not required to, interview the person alleged to be responsible
for the abuse or neglect or prepare an investigative report pursuant to subsection (5.3)(a) of this section. If a county department elects to interview the third-party individual, it shall first confer with its local law
enforcement agency.

(4.5) (a) The state department shall adopt rules setting forth procedures for the investigation of reports of institutional abuse. Such rules may provide for investigations to be conducted by an agency that contracts with the state and has staff trained
to conduct investigations, the county departments, or any other entity the state department deems appropriate. The procedures may include the use of a review team responsible to make recommendations to the state department
concerning the procedures for investigating institutional abuse.

The state department shall adopt rules that specify that, prior to notice of an investigation being sent to the parents or legal guardians of children cared for at a child care center, as that term is defined in section 26-6-903 or 26.5-5-303, or a family
child care home, as that term is defined in section 26.5-5-303, which children were not involved in the incident being investigated, the state department or the county department shall ensure that:

The incident of alleged child abuse or neglect that prompted the investigation is at the level of a medium, severe, or fatal incident of abuse or neglect, as defined by rule of the state board, or involves sexual abuse;

The state department or county department has made a determination as to whether notice to the parents or legal guardians of the uninvolved children is essential to the investigation of the specific allegation or is necessary for the safety of children
cared for at the facility; and

The state department or county department has stated in writing the basis for the determination and a state department or county department supervisor has provided written approval of the determination, which basis and approval may be in electronic form.

The rules adopted pursuant to subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (a.5) shall require the notice of investigation to be sent to the parents or legal guardians within seventy-two hours after the determination described in sub-subparagraph (B) of subparagraph
(I) of this paragraph (a.5) is made.

If, as a result of an investigation conducted pursuant to rules adopted in accordance with this subsection (4.5), institutional abuse is found to have occurred, the entity that conducted such investigation may:

If the institutional abuse is the result of a single act or occurrence at the facility, request that the owner, operator, or administrator of the facility formulate a plan of remedial action. Such request shall be made within a period established by the
state department. Within thirty days of the agency's request, the owner, operator, or administrator of the facility shall notify the agency, in writing, of a plan for remedial action. Within ninety days of the request,
the owner, operator, or administrator shall complete the plan for remedial action.

If the institutional abuse is one of several similar incidents that have occurred at the facility, request that the owner, operator, or administrator of the facility make administrative, personnel, or structural changes at the facility. Such request shall
be made within a period established by the state department. Within thirty days of such request, the owner, operator, or administrator of the facility shall notify the agency of the progress in complying with the
request. The agency and the owner, operator, or administrator shall establish the period in which the requested changes shall be completed.

If an owner, operator, or administrator of a facility does not formulate or implement a plan for remedial action in accordance with subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b) or make requested changes in accordance with subparagraph (II) of this paragraph
(b), recommend to the entity that licenses, oversees, certifies, or authorizes the operation of the facility that appropriate sanctions or actions be imposed against the facility.

A teacher, employee, volunteer, or staff person of an institution who is alleged to have committed an act of child abuse shall be temporarily suspended from his position at the institution with pay, or reassigned to other duties which would remove the
risk of harm to the child victim or other children under such person's custody or control, if there is reasonable cause to believe that the life or health of the victim or other children at the institution is in imminent
danger due to continued contact between the alleged perpetrator and a child at the institution. A public employee suspended pursuant to this paragraph (c) shall be accorded and may exercise due process rights, including
notice of the proposed suspension and an opportunity to be heard, and any other due process rights provided under the laws of this state governing public employment and under any applicable individual or group contractual
agreement. A private employee suspended pursuant to this subsection (4.5) shall be accorded and may exercise due process rights provided for under the laws of this state governing private employment and under any applicable
individual or group employee contractual agreement.

Nothing in this subsection (4.5) shall be construed to abrogate or limit any other enforcement action provided by law.

If a local law enforcement agency receives a report of a known or suspected incident of intrafamilial abuse or neglect, it shall forthwith attempt to contact the county department in order to refer the case for investigation. If the local law enforcement
agency is unable to contact the county department, it shall forthwith make a complete investigation and may institute appropriate legal proceedings on behalf of the subject child or other children under the same care. As a part
of an investigation pursuant to this subsection (5), the local law enforcement agency shall have access to the records and reports of child abuse or neglect maintained by the state department for information under the name of the
child or the suspected perpetrator. The local law enforcement agency, upon the receipt of a report and upon completion of any investigation it may undertake, shall forthwith forward a summary of the investigatory data plus all
relevant documents to the county department.

(5.3) (a) Local law enforcement agencies have the responsibility for the coordination and investigation of all reports of third-party abuse or neglect by persons ten years of age or older. Upon receipt of a report, if the local law enforcement agency
reasonably believes that the protection and safety of a child is at risk due to an act or omission on the part of persons responsible for the child's care, such agency shall notify the county department of human or social
services for an assessment regarding neglect or dependency. In addition, the local law enforcement agency shall refer to the county department of human or social services any report of third-party abuse or neglect in which
the person allegedly responsible for such abuse or neglect is under age ten. Upon the completion of an investigation, the local law enforcement agency shall forward a copy of its investigative report to the county department
of human or social services. The county department shall review the law enforcement investigative report and shall determine whether the report contains information that constitutes a case of confirmed child abuse and requires
it to be submitted to the state department, which report, upon such determination, shall be submitted to the state department in the manner prescribed by the state department within sixty days after the receipt of the report
by the county department.

If, before an investigation is completed, the local law enforcement agency determines that social services are necessary for the child and, if applicable, the child's family or that assistance from the county department of human or social services is
otherwise required, the agency may request said services or assistance from the county department. The county department shall immediately respond to a law enforcement agency's request for services or assistance in a manner
deemed appropriate by the county department.

When the investigation involves a suspected perpetrator who was acting in his official capacity as an employee of a school district, the local law enforcement agency shall coordinate such investigation with any concurrent abuse investigation being conducted
by the department of education or the school district to the extent such coordination is possible and deemed appropriate.

(5.5) Upon the receipt of a report, if the county department reasonably believes that an incident of abuse or neglect has occurred, it shall immediately notify the local law enforcement agency responsible for investigation of violations of criminal child
abuse laws. The local law enforcement agency may conduct an investigation to determine if a violation of any criminal child abuse law has occurred. It is the general assembly's intent that, in each county of the state, law
enforcement agencies and the respective county departments of human or social services develop and implement cooperative agreements to coordinate duties of both agencies in connection with the investigation of all child abuse
or neglect cases and that the focus of such agreements is to ensure the best protection for the child. The agreements must provide for special requests by one agency for assistance from the other agency and for joint investigations
by both agencies.

(5.7) Upon initial investigation of a report alleging abuse or neglect in which the suspected perpetrator was acting in his official capacity as an employee of a school district, if the county department or the local law enforcement agency reasonably
believes that an incident of abuse or neglect has occurred, it shall immediately notify the superintendent of the school district who shall consider such report to be confidential information; except that the superintendent
shall notify the department of education of such investigation.

It is the intent of the general assembly to encourage the creation of one or more child protection teams in each county or contiguous group of counties. The creation of a child protection team in any given county is left to the discretion of the county
director or the directors of a contiguous group of counties. If a county director or the directors of a contiguous group of counties decides to form a child protection team, the child protection team may be consolidated
with other local advisory boards pursuant to section

24-1.7-103

. If a child protection team is formed pursuant to this section in a county or contiguous group of counties, the director or directors of the county department or departments of human or social services
may, at their discretion, implement the provisions of this section.

If a child protection team is established pursuant to subsection (6)(a) of this section, it may review an assessment or the investigatory reports of a case, including the diagnostic, prognostic, and treatment services being offered to the family in connection
with the reported abuse.

At each meeting, each member of a child protection team established pursuant to subsection (6)(a) of this section may be provided with the investigatory reports on each assessment or case being considered.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 91, p. 223, § 4, effective May 24, 1991.)

Immediately after any executive session at which a child abuse or neglect case is discussed, a child protection team established pursuant to subsection (6)(a) of this section shall publicly review the responses of public and private agencies to each reported
incident of child abuse or neglect, publicly state whether the responses were timely, adequate, and in compliance with the provisions of this part 3, and publicly report nonidentifying information relating to any inadequate
responses, specifically indicating the public and private agencies involved.

After this mandatory public discussion of agency responses, a child protection team established pursuant to subsection (6)(a) of this section shall go into executive session upon the vote of a majority of the child protection team members to consider
identifying details of the case being discussed; discuss confidential reports, including but not limited to the reports of physicians, including psychiatrists; or, when the members of the child protection team desire, act
as an advisory body concerning the details of treatment or evaluation programs. The child protection team shall state publicly, before going into executive session, its reasons for doing so. Any recommendation based on
information presented in the executive session shall be discussed and formulated at the immediately succeeding public session of the child protection team, without publicly revealing identifying details of the case.

At the next regularly scheduled meeting of a child protection team established pursuant to subsection (6)(a) of this section, or at the earliest possible time, the child protection team shall publicly report whether there were any lapses and inadequacies
in the child protection system and if they have been corrected.

A child protection team established pursuant to subsection (6)(a) of this section may make a report of its recommendations to the county department with suggestions for further action or stating that the child protection team has no recommendations or
suggestions. Contiguous counties may cooperate in meeting the requirements of this subsection (6).

If a county or group of contiguous counties decides to establish a child protection team pursuant to subsection (6)(a) of this section, each member of the child protection team is appointed by the agency he or she represents, and each child protection
team member serves at the pleasure of his or her appointing agency; except that the county director may appoint the representatives of the lay community, including the representatives of any ethnic, racial, or linguistic minority,
as well as persons with disabilities, and may actively recruit all interested individuals and consider their applications for appointment as lay-community representatives on the team.

The county director or his or her designee is the local coordinator of the child protection team, if one is established pursuant to subsection (6)(a) of this section.

Repealed.

[Editor's note: This version of the introductory portion to subsection (10) is effective until January 9, 2023.] In the event that the local department initiates a petition in the juvenile court or the district court with juvenile jurisdiction on behalf
of the child who is the subject of a report, the department shall notify, in writing, the guardian ad litem appointed by the court under section 19-3-312 to represent the child's interest. Such notice shall include:

(10)

[

Editor's note: This version of the introductory portion to subsection (10) is effective January 9, 2023.

]
In the event that the local department initiates a petition in the juvenile court or the district court with juvenile jurisdiction on behalf of the child who is the subject of a report, the department shall notify,
in writing, the guardian ad litem or counsel for youth appointed by the court pursuant to section 19-3-312 to represent the child's interest. Such notice must include:

The reason for initiating the petition;

Suggestions as to the optimum disposition of this particular case; and

Suggested therapeutic treatment and social services available within the community for the subject child and the responsible person.

Upon a finding that a report contains information that constitutes a case of confirmed child abuse or neglect that requires it to be submitted to the state department, the person who is found to be responsible for the abuse or neglect of a child in the
confirmed report shall be given timely notice of this finding and of the right to appeal pursuant to rules established by the state board pursuant to section 19-3-313.5 (3).

The state department shall include a summary and description of work of child protection teams that were implemented pursuant to this section in its annual presentation to the legislative committees during the committees' hearings held prior to the 2017
regular session under the "State Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government Act", part 2 of article 7 of title 2.

Upon the receipt of a report of intrafamilial abuse or neglect or human trafficking, or a report that a family may be eligible for foster care prevention services, as defined in section 26-5.4-102 (1), the county department may provide foster care prevention
services for a child and the parents or kin caregivers of the child when the needs of the child are directly related to the safety, permanent placement, or well-being of the child or to prevent the child from entering the foster
care system.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 767, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 88:
(5.5) added, p. 744, § 13, effective July 1.

L. 90:
(4)(a) amended and (5.7) added, p. 1023, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 91:
(1), (3)(a), (4), (5), (5.5), (6), (9), and (10) amended and (4.5) and (5.3) added, p. 223, § 4, effective May 24; (4)(b) amended, p. 1912, § 22, effective June 1.

L. 93:
(1)(b) amended, p. 1169, § 1, effective June 3; (1)(a) amended, p. 1169, § 1, effective January 1, 1994.

L. 96:
(4)(a) amended, p. 84, § 9, effective March 20.

L. 97:
(2) amended, p. 1438, § 12, effective July 1; (6)(a) amended, p. 1191, § 15, effective July 1.

L. 99:
(1.5) added, p. 1076, § 2, effective May 29.

L. 2001:
(5.3)(a) amended, p. 854, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2003:
(4)(a), (5), and (5.3)(a) amended and (11) added, p. 1406, § 11, effective January 1, 2004.

L. 2004:
(4.5)(a.5) added, p. 1758, § 1, effective June 4; (1)(b) repealed, p. 194, § 9, effective August 4.

L. 2005:
(1)(c) added, p. 588, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2010:
(1.5)(c) added, (HB 10-1226), ch. 129, p. 425, § 2, effective April 15; (1.5)(b) amended, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 791, § 42, effective April 29.

L. 2015:
(1.5)(c) amended, (HB 15-1358), ch. 193, p. 641, § 2, effective May 14.

L. 2016:
IP(4.5)(a.5)(I) amended, (SB 16-189), ch. 210, p. 760, § 31, effective June 6; (4)(c) added, (HB 16-1224), ch. 101, p. 290, § 2, effective January 1, 2017.

L. 2017:
(6), (7), and (8) amended, (9) repealed, and (12) added, (SB 17-016), ch. 107, p. 389, § 2, effective August 9.

L. 2018:
(1.5)(b) amended, (HB 18-1094), ch. 343, p. 2044, § 9, effective June 30; (4)(c), (5.3)(a), (5.3)(b), and (5.5) amended, (SB 18-092), ch. 38, p. 418, § 53, effective August 8.

L. 2019:
(13) added, (HB 19-1308), ch. 256, p. 2460, § 6, effective August 2.

L. 2022:
IP(4.5)(a.5)(I) amended, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 835, § 38, effective July 1; IP(10) amended, (HB 22-1038), ch. 92, p. 442, § 25, effective January 9, 2023.